Hawaii statutes.
[§11-322] Organizational report,
candidate committee. (a) The candidate committee organizational report
shall include:

(1) The committee's name and address, including web
page address, if any;

(2) The candidate's name, address, and telephone
number;

(3) The office being sought by the candidate,
district, and party affiliation;

(4) The chairperson's name and address and, if
appointed, the deputy chairperson's name and address;

(5) The treasurer's name and address and, if appointed,
all deputy treasurers' names and addresses;

(6) The name and address of each depository
institution in which the committee will maintain any of its accounts and the applicable
account number;

(7) A certification by the candidate and treasurer of
the statements in the organizational report; and

(8) The name and address of each contributor who
contributed an aggregate amount of more than $100 to the candidate committee since
the last election applicable to the office being sought and the amount and date
of deposit of each such contribution.

(b) Any change in information previously
reported in the organizational report with the exception of subsection (a)(8)
shall be electronically filed with the commission within ten days of the change
being brought to the attention of the committee chairperson or treasurer. [L
2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next